Utah statutes.
59-5-204.   Statements filed -- Contents -- Verification -- Falsification as
perjury.
(1)  Every person engaged in the business of mining or extracting
metalliferous minerals shall make and file with the commission, on or before
June 1 of each year on forms furnished by the commission, a statement
containing:
(a)  the name, description, and location of the mine owned and operated by the
person during the preceding calendar year;
(b)  the number of tons of mineral mined during the preceding calendar year
and the disposition of the mineral;
(c)  the total amount received during the preceding calendar year from the
sale of minerals; and
(d)  such other reasonable and necessary information as the commission may
require for the proper enforcement of this chapter as specified in a rule
adopted under Title 63G, Chapter 3, the Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(2)  The owner of the mine shall be responsible for the statement or report
required by this section, but the principal lessee, contractor, or operator
may, with the consent of the commission, report and pay the tax as agent for
the owner.  The owner shall be entitled to deduct and remit to the commission
any tax chargeable upon the operations conducted by the lessees or other
parties.
(3)  The statements or reports required to be filed with the commission shall
be signed and sworn to by the person required to file the statements or
reports, by a partner if a partnership, or by the president, secretary, or
managing officer, if a corporation.  Any willful false swearing as to the
purported material facts set out in this report constitutes the crime of
perjury and shall be punished as such under Title 76, the Utah Criminal Code.
